src/scripts/Macedonian/latin_convert.foma
# Copyright (C) 2021 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define SimpleLatinMak 
a : а | 
b : б | 
v : в |
g : г | 
d : д | 
e : е | 
è : ѐ | 
z : з | 
i : и |
ì : ѝ |
k : к | 
l : л | 
m : м | 
n : н | 
o : о | 
p : п | 
r : р | 
s : с | 
t : т | 
u : у | 
f : ф | 
c : ц | 
h : х | 
j : ј -> || _;

# sole trigraph system
define TrigraphLatinMak 
{dzh} : џ @-> ||_; 
# digraph system
define DigraphLatinMak 
{gj} : ѓ |
{kj} : ќ |
{dj} : џ | 
{ts} : ц  |
{dž} : џ | 
{dz} : ѕ | 
{zh} : ж | 
{nj} : њ |
{sh} : ш | 
{ch} : ч | 
{lj} : љ @-> || _;

# diacritics system
define DiacriticsLatinMac 
ǵ : ѓ |
đ : ѓ |
ḱ  : ќ |
ć  : ќ |
ẑ  : ѕ | 
ž : ж | 
[ń|n̂] : њ |
š : ш | 
č : ч | 
[ĺ|l̂] : љ  -> || _;


define OtherEnglishLatinMak 
q : к | 
x : {кс} |
y : ј |
w : в -> || _; 

#  LatinConvertLSeq  omits specially named English latin letters.
# THis will be usd in Letter sequence. Other latin letters will be given cyrillic names
define LatinConvertLSeq  
 TrigraphLatinMak 
 .o. DigraphLatinMak 
 .o. DiacriticsLatinMac 
 .o. SimpleLatinMak 
; 
# This rule adds in phonetic transcription for word speech
define LatinConvert  
  LatinConvertLSeq
 .o.  OtherEnglishLatinMak
; 
